Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska7-101.01
Practice of law; students; Supreme Court; rule or order.

The Supreme Court may by rule or order authorize students pursuing a course in instruction in a law school in the State of Nebraska and who have successfully completed their junior year of instruction which students when graduated are eligible to take the examination for admission to the bar of this state to practice as attorneys or counselors at law upon such terms and conditions, and with such supervision, as the Supreme Court may prescribe.

Laws 1967, c. 17, § 2, p. 115.

Except as provided in this section, relating to certified law students, no person shall practice as an attorney or counselor at law, or commence, conduct, or defend any action or proceeding to which he or she is not a party, by using or subscribing his or her own name. Anderzhon/Architects v. 57 Oxbow II Partnership, 250 Neb. 768, 553 N.W.2d 157 (1996).